California statutes. Water Code
(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 22, Sec. 208.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

1014.

The transfer of water, or the offer of water for transfer, shall not cause, or be the basis for, a forfeiture, abandonment, or modification of any water right, contract right, or other right to the use of that water. An offer of water for transfer, contract negotiations, or a transfer agreement shall not be used as evidence of waste or unreasonable use, or of cessation of use, of the water made available for transfer.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 938, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

1015.

During the term of a temporary change, as defined in Section 1725.5, if an enforcement action or other proceeding is commenced that alleges that the use of water violates Section 2 of Article X of the California Constitution, Sections 100, 101, 1410, and 1675, or any other legislative, administrative, or judicial limitation on the water that is subject to that water transfer and the water involved is, at the time of the alleged violation, subject to a water transfer, the determination of the alleged violation shall be based on an assessment of the transferee’s use of transferred water. If a transferee’s right to use transferred water is divested, in whole or in part, on the basis of the transferee’s abandonment, forfeiture, waste,
 or unreasonable use of the transferred water, the divested portion of the right shall revert immediately to the transferor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 675, Sec. 1.   (AB 2895)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

1016.

(a) At the conclusion of the term of a water transfer agreement, all rights in, and the use of, the water subject to the agreement revert back to the transferor.

(b) After the conclusion of the term of a water transfer agreement, the transferee or any beneficiary of the transfer shall not do either of the following:

(1) Bring any claim for a continuation of the water supply made available by the agreement.

(2) Claim any right to a continued supply of water as a result of the transfer, based on reliance, estoppel, intervening public use, prescription, water shortage emergency, or unforeseen or unforeseeable increases in demand, or any other cause.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 938, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

1017.

The beneficial use of water pursuant to a transfer or exchange authorized pursuant to Chapter 6.6 (commencing with Section 1435) of, Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 1700) of, Chapter 10.5 (commencing with Section 1725) of, Part 2, or any other provision of law, shall constitute a beneficial use of water by the holder of the permit, license, water right, or other entitlement for use that is the basis for the transfer or exchange, and shall not affect any determination or forfeiture applicable to water appropriated pursuant to the Water Commission Act or this code
 or water appropriated prior to December 19, 1914.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 938, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

1018.

When agricultural lands are being idled in order to provide water for transfer pursuant to this division, and an amount of water is determined to be made available by that idling, landowners shall be encouraged to cultivate or retain nonirrigated cover crops or natural vegetation to provide waterfowl, upland game bird, and other wildlife habitat, provided that all other water transfer requirements are met.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 387, Sec. 14.   (SB 749)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 1.5. Water Leases [1020. - 1031.]

1020.

Water may be leased for a period not to exceed five years to assist water conservation efforts pursuant to the terms and conditions of this chapter. The terms and conditions of this chapter are not applicable to water leases or transfers governed by other provisions of law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 847, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

1021.

(a) The water subject to a water lease agreement shall be water that is subject to a water right of the lessor. The amount of water leased shall not exceed 25 percent of the water that would have been applied or stored by the lessor in the absence of the lease agreement in any given hydrological year. 

(b) Each lease agreement shall include enforceable terms which will ensure that the water lease will not injure any legal user of water and will not unreasonably affect fish, wildlife, or other instream beneficial uses. 

(c) This chapter applies only to surface water appropriated pursuant to the Water Commission Act (Chapter 586 of the Statutes of 1913, as amended) or this code, or to water appropriated prior to December 19, 1914.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 847, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

1022.

If the water subject to the lease is held by a water district, a water company, or a mutual water company, hereafter collectively referred to as the district, the following provisions apply:

(a) The governing body of the district may, by a resolution adopted and entered in its minutes, determine that the district should lease water pursuant to this chapter, or, if otherwise required by law, determine that an election should be held to lease water pursuant to this chapter. The district shall
 administer any water lease and determine whether water is in excess of the needs of the district and is available for a lease.

(b) Any water lease administered by the district shall include provisions to achieve all of the following:

(1) Establish a schedule for district water users to provide written notice of the intention to participate in a water lease.

(2) Establish a minimum price for the water available for leasing to maintain the financial integrity of the district and enter into leases for that water at market values at or above the minimum price.

(3) Annually distribute the net monetary proceeds to water users in the district who have participated in the water leases, according to district water allocation policies, after first deducting
 district costs. These costs include, but are not limited to, the cost of the water, whether or not water is delivered, the costs of conveyance, distribution and development facilities, lease administration, and other appropriate district costs apportioned to water users in the district who forego the use of district water to participate in the water lease.

(c) Participation in a water lease administered by the district pursuant to this section is deemed to be a public service generally provided by the public body or board for purposes of paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 1091.5 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 56, Sec. 1.   Effective May 14, 1992.)
-------------------------------------------

1024.

(a) Nothing in this chapter authorizes the sale of any water right or the modification of any water right or contract. 

(b) No right in any water, water contract, or water right shall be acquired by a use permitted under this chapter. 

(c) (1) When any person entitled to the use of water under an appropriative right fails to use all or any part of the water because of water conservation efforts and leases that conserved water under this chapter, any such cessation of, or reduction in,
 the use of the appropriated water that is leased is deemed equivalent to a reasonable beneficial use of water to the extent of that cessation of, or reduction in, use. No forfeiture of the appropriative right to the water conserved shall occur upon the lapse of the forfeiture period applicable to water appropriated pursuant to the Water Commission Act (Chapter 586 of the Statutes of 1913, as amended) or this code, or to water appropriated prior to December 19, 1914. 

(2) The state board may require any lessor of water who seeks the benefit of this chapter to file periodic reports describing the extent and amount of the reduction in water use due to water conservation efforts. To the maximum extent possible, the reports shall be made a part of other reports required by the state board relating to the use of water. Failure to file the reports shall deprive the user of water of the benefits of this chapter. 

(3) For purposes of this chapter, “water conservation” means the use of less water to accomplish the same purpose or purposes of use allowed under the existing appropriative right. Where water appropriated for irrigation purposes is not used by reason of land fallowing or crop rotation, the reduced usage shall be deemed water conservation for purposes of this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 847, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

1024.5.

This chapter does not limit any review of the lessee’s use of the leased water.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 847, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

1025.

If the lessor or lessee is a water district, the water lessor shall file a notice with the state board of the water lease agreement and include in the notice all of the following:

(a) A copy of the lease agreement. 

(b) Any water permit or license number. 

(c) A description of the environmental conditions in the lease, permit, and license which protect fish and wildlife. 

(d) A statement of how the
 lease will assist water conservation efforts of the lessor. 

(e) An agreement undertaken by the lessor and the lessee which specifies how the environmental protection terms and conditions in the permit, license, or lease, and the applicable conditions established pursuant to Section 1029 for the permit, license, or other water right, will be complied with for the duration of the lease.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 847, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

1025.5.

(a) If both the lessor and lessee are private parties, the lessor shall file an application with the board for approval of the lease agreement and shall include in the application all of the following:

(1) The information and materials described in subdivisions (a) to (e), inclusive, of Section 1025.

(2) Other information that the state board determines is necessary to review the application.

(3) The application fee set pursuant to Section 1525.

(b) The board, after providing notice and opportunity for a hearing, may approve the lease if, in the judgment of the board, the lease would not operate to injure the legal users of water or unreasonably affect fish, wildlife, or other instream beneficial uses.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 741, Sec. 79.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

1025.7.

Water leases pursuant to this chapter are not subject to Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 1700) or Chapter 10.5 (commencing with Section 1725) of Part 2.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 847, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

1026.

The lead agency shall not approve a water lease until 30 days after the board provides written public notice, including notice by personal delivery or registered mail to legal users of water which may be affected by the lease, as identified by the board, the Department of Fish and Wildlife, and any party requesting special notice of water leases pursuant to this chapter. The water lessor shall pay a reasonable fee, in an amount determined by the state board, for the cost of providing the notice.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 683, Sec. 42.   (SB 798)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

1027.

(a) Any water lease agreement entered into pursuant to this chapter involving the transfer of water from the Sacramento-San Joaquin Delta shall provide outflow consistent with the carriage water requirements determined by the department to be necessary for the transfer of the water subject to the lease to maintain the water quality which would exist in the delta without the transfer undertaken in connection with the water lease. 

(b) Any water lease agreement providing for the lease of water from a lessor north of the Sacramento/San Joaquin Delta to a lessee south of the
 Sacramento/San Joaquin Delta shall provide for an amount of water for delta salt water repulsion and environmental purposes as administratively prescribed by the state board in proportion to all similar requirements for delta exports.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 847, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

1028.

In any proceeding pursuant to Section 1029, the court shall determine issues relating to the lease and the effects of the water transfer pursuant to the lease on the legal users of water and on fish and wildlife, but any request or petition to permanently change the water right which may be subject to the lease shall be heard in a separate proceeding.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 847, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

1029.

Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000) of the Public Resources Code applies to water lease agreements authorized by this chapter. For purposes of that division, the lessor is the lead agency, except that if the lessor is a private party and the lessee is a water district, the lessee is the lead agency. If both the lessor and the lessee are private parties, the state board is the lead agency.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 847, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

1030.

During the term of the water lease, the state board shall monitor the lease, as appropriate. The state board shall initiate proceedings, if appropriate, to enforce the terms and conditions of water leases, and permits and licenses or water use authority to ensure that the water lease does not operate to injure any legal user of the water or unreasonably affect fish, wildlife, or other instream beneficial uses.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 847, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

1031.

A water lease pursuant to this chapter shall not take effect until the first annual fee, set pursuant to Section 1525, is paid, and the lease shall not continue in effect in any subsequent year unless the annual fee for that year is paid.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 741, Sec. 80.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Administrative Provisions Generally [1050. - 1060.]

1050.

This division is hereby declared to be in furtherance of the policy contained in Section 2 of Article X of the California Constitution and in all respects for the welfare and benefit of the people of the state, for the improvement of their prosperity and their living conditions, and the board and the department shall be regarded as performing a governmental function in carrying out the provisions of this division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 373.)
-------------------------------------------

1051.

(a) The board for the purpose of this division may:

(1) Investigate all streams, stream systems, portions of stream systems, lakes, or other bodies of water.

(2) Take testimony in regard to the rights to water or the use of water thereon or therein.

(3) Investigate and ascertain whether or not water heretofore filed upon or any claimed riparian or appropriative right is valid under the laws of this state.

(b) (1) In furtherance of an investigation authorized pursuant to this section, the board may issue an information order, as executed by the executive director of the board.

(2) The information order may be issued to a water right holder or
 claimant
 to provide the following information related to a diversion and use of water:

(A) Information required to be reported pursuant to Part 5.1 (commencing with Section 5100).

(B) Information concerning the basis of the water right claimed.

(C) Information related to the patent date claimed for the place of use, if the claimed right is a riparian right.

(D) Information concerning the notice date of the appropriation and the date of actual delivery of water to beneficial use.

(E) Information concerning prior diversions and use, including direct diversions and diversions to storage.

(3) (A) The information order may be issued to a diverter or user of water to provide information concerning that diverter’s prior diversion or use, including direct diversions and diversions to storage, or identification of the person or holder claiming the right under which the water was diverted or used.

(B) Information obtained under this paragraph from a diverter or user who is not the water right holder or claimant shall not be binding on, or treated as an admission by, the water right holder or claimant.

(c) The burden of any order issued under subdivision (b), including costs, shall bear a reasonable relationship to the need for the requested information and the benefits to be obtained from the board receiving that information. In making a request, the board shall do both of the following:

(1) Provide the person to whom the request is directed with a written explanation with regard to the need for the information.

(2) Identify the evidence that supports requiring that person to provide the information.

(d) A diversion or use of water ascertained to be unauthorized may
 be enforced as a trespass under Section
 1052, following notice and opportunity for hearing as required under Section 1052, Section 1055, or Article 2 (commencing with Section 1831) of Chapter 12 of Part 2.

(e) Nothing in this section shall limit any authority held by the board under this code or any other provision of law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 486, Sec. 1.   (SB 389)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

1051.1.

(a) In conducting an investigation or proceeding specified in Section 275 or 1051, or in Article 7 (commencing with Section 13550) of Chapter 7 of Division 7, the board may inspect the property or facilities of any person or entity to ascertain whether the purposes of Section 100 and this division are being met or to ascertain compliance with any permit, license, certification, registration, decision, order, or regulation issued under Section 275, this division, or Article 7 (commencing with Section 13550) of Chapter 7 of Division 7.

(b) If consent to inspect is denied or otherwise withheld, the board is authorized to obtain an inspection warrant pursuant to the procedure set forth in Title 13 (commencing with Section 1822.50) of Part 3 of the
 Code of Civil Procedure for purposes of an inspection under this subdivision. However, in the event of an emergency affecting the public health or safety pertaining to the particular site under which the inspection is being sought, an inspection may be performed without consent or the issuance of a warrant.

(c) The board may participate in an inspection of an unlicensed cannabis cultivation site conducted pursuant to a warrant duly issued pursuant to the Penal Code when requested by the party seeking that warrant for unlicensed cannabis cultivation and its associated activities that may involve a violation of this code, including, but not limited to, diversion or use of water in violation of this division or of any principles and guidelines established by the board pursuant to Section 13149.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 158, Sec. 1.   (SB 756)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

1051.5.

In furtherance of its powers and duties under Parts 2 (commencing with Section 1200) and 3 (commencing with Section 2000) of this division, the board may supervise trial distribution of water in accordance with agreements and court orders therefor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1967, Ch. 284.)
-------------------------------------------

1052.

(a) The diversion or use of water subject to this division other than as authorized in this division is a trespass.

(b) (1) An action for the issuance of injunctive relief as may be warranted by way of temporary restraining order, preliminary injunction, or permanent injunction, may be brought by the Attorney General on behalf of the board, or in the Attorney General’s independent capacity in the name of the people of the State of California, where the diversion or use of water is threatened, is occurring, or has occurred.

(2) (A) A civil action for a violation under this section resulting from unlicensed cannabis cultivation may also be brought by a city attorney or county counsel, upon approval of the board, in the name of the people
 of the State of California.

(B) A city attorney or county counsel shall inform and coordinate with the board as to the investigation of potential violations of this section related to unlicensed cannabis cultivation. Unless the board withholds its approval within 21 days after the local jurisdiction provides notice of its intent to file, the local jurisdiction may deem the board’s silence as approval.

(c) A person or entity committing a trespass as defined in this section may be liable in an amount not to exceed the following:

(1) If the unauthorized diversion or use occurs in a critically dry year
 immediately preceded by two or more consecutive below normal, dry, or critically dry
 years, or during a period for which the Governor has issued a proclamation of a state of emergency under the California Emergency Services Act (Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 8550) of Division 1 of Title 2 of the Government Code) based on drought conditions, the sum of the following:

(A) One thousand dollars ($1,000) for each day in which the trespass occurs.

(B) Two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) for each acre-foot of water diverted or used in excess of that diverter’s water rights.

(2) If the unauthorized diversion or use is not described by paragraph (1), five hundred dollars ($500) for each day in which the unauthorized diversion or use occurs.

(3) Notwithstanding paragraphs (1) and (2), up to three thousand five hundred dollars ($3,500) for each day in which the unauthorized diversion or use for unlicensed cannabis cultivation occurs.

(d) Civil liability for a violation of this section may be imposed by the superior court or the board as follows:

(1) The superior court may impose civil liability in an action brought by the Attorney General, upon request of the board, to impose, assess, and recover any sums pursuant to subdivision (c). In determining the appropriate amount, the court shall take into consideration all relevant circumstances, including, but not limited to, the extent of harm caused by the violation, the nature and persistence of the violation, the length of time over which the violation occurs, and the corrective action, if
 any, taken by the violator.

(2) The superior court may impose civil liability in an action for a violation under this section resulting from unlicensed cannabis cultivation brought by a city attorney or county counsel to impose, assess, and recover any sums pursuant to subdivision (c). In determining the appropriate amount, the court shall take into consideration all relevant circumstances, including, but not limited to, the extent of harm caused by the violation, whether the violation was intentional or committed knowingly, the nature and persistence of the violation, the length of time over which the violation has occurred, and the corrective action, if any, taken by the violator. The court shall make its findings on the record.

(3) The board may impose civil liability in accordance with Section 1055.

(e) (1) Upon appropriation by the Legislature, funds recovered in an action pursuant to this section shall be used to proportionally reimburse the Attorney General, city attorney, county counsel, and the board for costs of bringing the action, including reasonable attorney’s fees, and of investigating the violation and supporting the prosecution of the action.

(2) Except for reimbursements to the Attorney General, city attorney, or county counsel, as specified in paragraph (1), all funds recovered pursuant to this section shall be deposited in the Water Rights Fund established pursuant to Section 1550.

(f) The remedies prescribed in this section are cumulative and not alternative.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 56, Sec. 37.   (AB 195)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

1053.

A full and accurate record of business or acts performed or of testimony taken by the board and the department in pursuance of the provisions of this division shall be kept and be placed on file in the office of the board or the department, as the case may be.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1932.)
-------------------------------------------

1054.

The board and the department may certify to all of their official acts and may certify copies of all official documents and orders filed in their respective offices. For the purpose of making such certifications, the board and the department may adopt seals.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 947.)
-------------------------------------------

1055.

(a) The executive director of the board may issue a complaint to any person or entity on which administrative civil liability may be imposed pursuant to Section 1052, Article 4 (commencing with Section 1845) of Chapter 12 of Part 2 of Division 2, or Section 5107. The complaint shall allege the act or failure to act that constitutes a trespass or violation, the provision of law authorizing civil liability to be imposed, and the proposed civil liability.

(b) The complaint shall be served by personal notice, certified mail, in accordance with the manner of service of a summons under Article 3 (commencing with Section 415.10) of, and Article 4 (commencing with Section 416.10) of, Chapter 4 of Title 5 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure, or by any method of physical
 delivery that provides a receipt. The complaint shall inform the party served that the party may request a hearing not later than 20 days from the date the party was served and that the board may adopt an order setting administrative civil liability based on the allegations set forth in the complaint without a hearing if the party does not sign a written request for a hearing that is delivered to, or received by mail by, the board within 20 days after the date the party was served. The hearing shall be before the board or a member of the board, in accordance with Section 183. For purposes of this subdivision, “physical delivery that provides a receipt” includes physical delivery methods that provide electronic confirmation of delivery to the intended address.

(c) The board, after any necessary hearing, may adopt an order setting administrative civil liability, or determining that a liability shall not be imposed.

(d) Orders setting administrative civil liability shall become effective and final upon issuance thereof and payment shall be made.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 158, Sec. 2.   (SB 756)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

1055.2.

A person or entity shall not be subject to both civil liability imposed under Section 1055 and civil liability imposed by the superior court under Section 1052 or Article 4 (commencing with Section 1845) of Chapter 12 of Part 2 of Division 2 for the same act or failure to act.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 288, Sec. 6.   (SB 1169)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

1055.3.

In determining the amount of civil liability, the board shall take into consideration all relevant circumstances, including, but not limited to, the extent of harm caused by the violation, the nature and persistence of the violation, the length of time over which the violation occurs, and the corrective action, if any, taken by the violator.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 756, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

1055.4.

After the time for review under Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 1120) has expired, the board may apply to the clerk of the appropriate court for a judgment to collect the administrative civil liability imposed in accordance with Section 1055. The application, which shall include a certified copy of the board action, constitutes a sufficient showing to warrant issuance of the judgment. The court clerk shall enter the judgment immediately in conformity with the application. The judgment so entered has the same force and effect as, and is subject to all the
 provisions of law relating to, a judgment in a civil action, and may be enforced in the same manner as any other judgment of the court in which it is entered.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 323, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

1055.5.

(a) (1) The board shall adjust on an annual basis, by January 1 of each year beginning in 2026, all civil and administrative liabilities or penalties imposed by the board or in an action brought at the request of the board pursuant to this division, to adjust the maximum amounts specified in this division for inflation, as established by the amount by which the California Consumer Price Index for the month of June of the year prior to the
 adjustment exceeds the California Consumer Price Index for June of the calendar year in which legislation was last enacted establishing or amending the maximum amount of the liability or penalty.

(2) The amount of any liability or penalty determined pursuant to this subdivision shall be rounded as follows:

(A) To the nearest multiple of ten dollars ($10) in the case of a liability or penalty that is less than or equal to one hundred dollars ($100).

(B) To the nearest multiple of one hundred dollars ($100) in the case of a liability or penalty that is greater than one hundred dollars ($100), but less than or equal to one thousand dollars ($1,000).

(C) To the
 nearest multiple of one thousand dollars ($1,000) in the case of a liability or penalty that is greater than one thousand dollars ($1,000), but less than or equal to ten thousand dollars ($10,000).

(D) To the nearest multiple of five thousand dollars ($5,000) in the case of a liability or penalty that is greater than ten thousand dollars ($10,000).

(3) Inflation adjustments made pursuant to this subdivision are exempt from the requirements of Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code. The updated civil and administrative liability or penalties pursuant to the inflation adjustment shall be filed with the Secretary of State and published in the California Code of Regulations.

(b) This section does not apply to any liability imposed under Section 1538.

(c) The board shall report to the Legislature, in accordance with Section 9795 of the Government Code, with regard to the implementation of this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 342, Sec. 1.   (AB 460)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

1056.

The board and the department may fix reasonable charges for publications issued under their respective authorities.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1932.)
-------------------------------------------

1057.

All fees charged and collected under this chapter shall be paid, at least once each month, accompanied by a detailed statement thereof, into the State Treasury.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 330.)
-------------------------------------------

1058.

The board may make such reasonable rules and regulations as it may from time to time deem advisable in carrying out its powers and duties under this code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1969, Ch. 482.)
-------------------------------------------

1058.5.

(a) This section applies to any emergency regulation adopted by the board for which the board makes both of the following findings:

(1) The emergency regulation is adopted to prevent the waste, unreasonable use, unreasonable method of use, or unreasonable method of diversion, of water, to promote water recycling or water conservation, to require curtailment of diversions when water is not available under the diverter’s priority of right, or in furtherance of any of the foregoing, to require reporting of diversion or use or the preparation of monitoring reports.

(2) The emergency regulation is adopted in response to conditions
 which exist, or are threatened, in a critically dry year immediately preceded by two or more consecutive below normal, dry, or critically dry years or during a period for which the Governor has issued a proclamation of a state of emergency under the California Emergency Services Act (Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 8550) of Division 1 of Title 2 of the Government Code) based on drought conditions.

(b) Notwithstanding Sections 11346.1 and 11349.6 of the Government Code, any findings of emergency adopted by the board, in connection with the adoption of an emergency regulation under this section, are not subject to review by the Office of Administrative Law.

(c) (1) An emergency regulation adopted by the board pursuant to this section may remain in effect
 for up to one year, as determined by the board, and is deemed repealed immediately upon a finding by the board that due to changed conditions it is no longer necessary for the regulation to remain in effect. An emergency regulation adopted by the board pursuant to this section may be renewed if the board determines that the conditions specified in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) are still in effect.

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), the requirements of Article 23.5 (commencing with Section 875) of Chapter 2 of Division 3 of Title 23 of the California Code of Regulations, as operative January 27, 2025, shall remain in effect until January 1, 2031, or until permanent rules establishing and implementing long-term instream flow requirements in the Scott River and Shasta River watersheds are adopted, whichever occurs first.
 The board shall provide annual public updates, including opportunities for public comment, on its progress toward developing permanent flow rules for the rivers while this provision is in effect.

(d) In addition to any other applicable civil or criminal penalties, any person or entity that violates a regulation adopted by the board pursuant to this section is guilty of an infraction punishable by a fine of up to five hundred dollars ($500) for each day in which the violation occurs.

(e) (1) Notwithstanding subdivision (b) of Section 1551 or subdivision (e) of Section 1848, a civil liability imposed under Chapter 12 (commencing with Section 1825) of Part 2 of Division 2 by the board or a court for a violation of an emergency conservation
 regulation adopted pursuant to this section shall be deposited, and separately accounted for, in the Water Rights Fund. Funds deposited in accordance with this subdivision shall be available, upon appropriation, for water conservation activities and programs.

(2) For purposes of this subdivision, an “emergency conservation regulation” means an emergency regulation that requires an end user of water, a water retailer, or a water wholesaler to conserve water or report to the board on water conservation. Water conservation includes restrictions or limitations on particular uses of water or a reduction in the amount of water used or served, but does not include curtailment of diversions when water is not available under the diverter’s priority of right or reporting requirements related to curtailments.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 130, Sec. 2.   (AB 263)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

1059.

The board and the department, as to matters under each of their respective jurisdictions, may designate one or more of their employees who shall have authority to certify under their respective seals all copies of orders, applications, permits, licenses, certificates, and other records under this division, and to attest all records, transcripts, evidence, and other original documents which it is necessary so to authenticate.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1932.)
-------------------------------------------

1060.

(a) All fees collected by the State Water Resources Control Board or by a California regional water quality control board, and deposited in the State Treasury, except funds collected under Part 3 (commencing with Section 2000) of this division, funds received for trial distribution expenses in connection with the administration of Section 1051.5, and deposits and payments made pursuant to Section 5007, shall be credited to the appropriation for the support of the board which is current at the time of the deposit of such fees in the State Treasury.

(b) Money deposited with or paid to the
 board pursuant to Section 1051.5 or 5007 and deposited by the board in the State Treasury is available for expenditure by the board in accordance with those sections without regard to fiscal years and irrespective of the provisions of Section 16304 of the Government Code, and any unused balance shall be refunded by the board to the person entitled thereto.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1288.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Witnesses and Production of Evidence [1075. - 1106.]



  ARTICLE 1. Definitions [1075. - 1076.]

1075.

As used in this chapter, “proceeding” means any inquiry, investigation, hearing, ascertainment, or other proceeding ordered or undertaken by the board pursuant to this code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1969, Ch. 482.)
-------------------------------------------

1076.

As used in this chapter, “evidence” means any paper, book, map, account, or document.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1943, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Attendance and Fees [1080. - 1086.]

1080.

The board may administer oaths and issue subpenas for the attendance and giving of testimony by witnesses and for the production of evidence in any proceeding in any part of the State.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1932.)
-------------------------------------------

1081.

Each witness who appears by order of the board shall receive for his attendance the same fees and mileage allowed by law to witnesses in civil cases, which shall be paid by the party at whose request the witness is subpenaed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1932.)
-------------------------------------------

1082.

When any witness who has not been required to attend at the request of any party is subpenaed by the board his fees and mileage shall be paid from the funds appropriated for the use of the board and available for the purpose.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1932.)
-------------------------------------------

1083.

Any witness subpenaed, except one whose fees and mileage are payable from the funds of the board, may, at the time of service, demand the fees to which he is entitled for travel to and from the place at which he is required to appear and one day’s attendance.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1932.)
-------------------------------------------

1084.

If the witness demands the fees to which he is entitled at the time of service and they are not at that time paid or tendered he shall not be required to attend as directed in the subpena.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1943, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

1085.

All fees and mileage to which any witness is entitled under the provisions of this chapter may be collected by action therefor instituted by the person to whom they are payable.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1943, Ch. 368.)